Idaho, session 2025, H0389.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 38-107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
38-107. UNCONTROLLED FIRES A NUISANCE -- ABATEMENT -- CIVIL LIABIL-
ITY. (1) Any forest or range fire on any land within the state of Idaho, re-
gardless of ownership status, that is burning out of control or without ad-
equate and proper precautions having been taken to prevent its spread, is
hereby declared a public nuisance, by reason of its menace to life and/or
property. Any person responsible through his conduct, acts and/or control
of property or operations for either the starting or the existence of such
fire is hereby required to make a reasonable effort to control or extinguish
it immediately, without awaiting instructions from the director of the de-
partment of lands or a fire warden. The director of the department of lands
or any fire warden may summarily abate the nuisance thus constituted by con-
trolling or extinguishing such fire and the person willfully or negligently
responsible for the starting or existence of such fire shall be liable for
the costs incurred by the state or its authorized agencies in controlling
or extinguishing the same. The amount of such costs shall be recovered by
a civil action prosecuted in the name of the state of Idaho and any amounts
recovered shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit to the forest pro-
tection fund. Civil liability provided for herein shall be exclusive of and
in addition to any criminal penalties otherwise provided.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a civil action
against any person, legal entity, state or political subdivision for forest
or range fire caused by a negligent or unintentional act, which act was not
willful or intentional under section 6-202, Idaho Code, the real and per-
sonal property damage is limited to:
(a) The reasonable costs for controlling or extinguishing the forest or
range fire;
(b) Economic damages; and
(c) Either (i) the diminution of fair market value of the real and per-
sonal property resulting from the fire, or (ii) the actual and tangible
restoration costs associated with bringing the damaged real and per-
sonal property back to its pre-injured state to the extent that such
actual and tangible restoration costs are reasonable and practical.


As used in this subsection, "economic damages" means objectively verifiable
monetary loss including, but not limited to, out-of-pocket expenses, loss of
earnings, loss of use of property or loss of business or employment oppor-
tunities. As further used in this subsection, "fair market value" means the
amount a willing buyer would pay a willing seller in an arms-length trans-
action when both parties are fully informed about all of the advantages and
disadvantages of the property and neither is acting under any compulsion to
buy or sell, as determined by a state certified appraiser, who is qualified
to appraise the property. Claims against the state or a political subdivi-
sion shall remain subject to the requirements of chapter 9, title 6, Idaho
Code, and damages against the state or a political subdivision shall be the
amount set forth in chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code, as limited in this subsec-
tion.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, civil actions brought
pursuant to this section shall be barred by a statute of limitations after
ten (10) years.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 1, Title 38, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 38-131B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
38-131B. DEFICIENCY WARRANTS FOR COSTS OF FIRE SUPPRESSION ON FEDERAL
LANDS. (1) It is the policy of the state of Idaho that any forest or range fire
constituting a nuisance pursuant to section 38-107, Idaho Code, on any land
within the state of Idaho be summarily abated as quickly and efficiently as
possible.
(2) In the event that the governor declares an emergency exists because
of a fire burning uncontrolled on federal lands that threatens the health,
safety, and welfare of Idaho citizens or that is imminently threatening the
property of the state of Idaho, any political subdivision thereof, or any
resident thereof, then the governor may take immediate action by directing
state resources to assist in controlling and extinguishing the fire, includ-
ing authorizing the issuance of deficiency warrants. When so authorized,
the state controller shall draw deficiency warrants against the general
fund.
(3) The cost incurred by the state of Idaho in controlling or extin-
guishing the fire shall be recovered by a civil action prosecuted in the name
of the state of Idaho by the attorney general. The funds recovered shall be
returned to the general fund to offset the amount of the deficiency warrant.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.